Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.825

Guilty plea or conviction for certain felony crimes—Notification of state patrol—Transmission of information to the department of health.

(1) Upon a guilty plea or conviction of a person for any felony crime involving homicide under chapter 9A.32 RCW, assault under chapter 9A.36 RCW, kidnapping under chapter 9A.40 RCW, sex offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW, financial crimes under chapter 9A.60 RCW, violations of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50 RCW, any drug offense defined under RCW 9.94A.030, or a crime of any type classified as a felony under Washington state law, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the state patrol of such guilty pleas or convictions.

(2) When the state patrol receives information that a person has pled guilty to or been convicted of one of the felony crimes under subsection (1) of this section, the state patrol shall transmit that information to the department of health. It is the duty of the department of health to identify whether the person holds a credential issued by a disciplining authority listed under RCW 18.130.040, and provide this information to the disciplining authority that issued the credential to the person who pled guilty or was convicted of a crime listed in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2008 c 134 s 28; 2006 c 99 s 8.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.